Hawaii statutes.
[§386-71.5] Rehabilitation unit. There
is established within the department of labor and industrial relations a
rehabilitation unit. All professional and clerical employees of this unit
shall be appointed by the director. The rehabilitation unit shall have the
duties and responsibilities provided in section 386-25. Employees of the unit
shall be subject to chapter 76. [L 1980, c 224, §1; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next